Wyoming, session 2026, SF0005.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 18-8-109(a)(intro), (b) and (c) and
35-2-438(a)(intro) and by creating a new subsection (d) are
amended to read:
18-8-109. Dissolution; bankruptcy.
(a) Subject to the requirements of this section, the
trustees of a memorial hospital may vote to file bankruptcy
under chapter 9 of the United States bankruptcy code or to
dissolve and terminate the county memorial hospital. The
plan to dissolve and terminate the county memorial hospital
shall provide for the following:
(b) Before any vote by the trustees to file
bankruptcy or plan to dissolve and terminate a county
memorial hospital is effective, the bankruptcy petition and
initial plan for the adjustment of debts or the dissolution
and termination plan shall be approved by the board of
county commissioners.
(c) If the board of county commissioners approves the
bankruptcy petition and initial plan for adjustment of
debts or the dissolution and termination plan, the board of
trustees may take all action necessary to obtain
confirmation of the plan of adjustment and closure of the
case under chapter 9 of the United States bankruptcy code
or take all action necessary to effectuate the plan and
dissolve and terminate the county memorial hospital.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0005
ENROLLED ACT NO. 10, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
35-2-438. Dissolution; bankruptcy.
(a) Subject to the requirements of this section, the
trustees of a hospital district may vote to file bankruptcy
under chapter 9 of the United States bankruptcy code or to
dissolve and terminate the district. The plan to dissolve
and terminate the district shall provide for the following:
(d) Filing of bankruptcy under subsection (a) of this
section shall not require a vote of qualified electors.
Before any vote by the trustees of a hospital district to
file bankruptcy, the bankruptcy petition and initial plan
for adjustment of debts shall be posted on any website
operated by the district and be publicly available for a
period of not less than seven (7) days prior to the first
public meeting of the trustees where the petition and plan
will be considered. If the trustees approve the bankruptcy
petition and initial plan for adjustment of debts, the
trustees may take all action necessary to obtain
confirmation of the plan of adjustment and closure of the
case under chapter 9 of the United States bankruptcy code.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0005
ENROLLED ACT NO. 10, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3